District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

3-3503

Qualifications; terms of office.

Expired.

History

Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-72, § 4, 40 DCR 7585

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3903.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 10-72

See note to § 3-3501.